Utah statutes.
63M-7-302.   Chair -- Vacancies -- Quorum -- Expenses.
(1)  The Utah Substance Abuse Advisory Council shall annually select one of
its members to serve as chair and one of its members to serve as vice chair.
(2)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term in the same manner as the position
was originally filled.
(3)  A majority of the members of the council constitutes a quorum.
(4)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(5)  The council may establish committees as needed to assist in accomplishing
its duties under Section 63M-7-303.
